District of Columbia statutes.
7-1203.05

Disclosures for research, auditing and program evaluation.

In addition to the disclosures authorized pursuant to Chapter 2A of this title [§ 7-251 et seq.], a mental health professional or mental health facility may disclose mental health information to qualified personnel, if necessary, for the purpose of conducting scientific research or management audits, financial audits or program evaluation of the mental health professional or mental health facility; provided, that such personnel have demonstrated and provided assurances, in writing, of their ability to insure compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Such personnel shall not identify, directly or indirectly, an individual client in any reports of such research, audit or evaluation, or otherwise disclose client identities in any manner; except, that de-identified data may be shared in accordance with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, approved August 21, 1996 (110 Stat. 1936; 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.).

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 305, 25 DCR 5055
Dec. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-273, § 204(b), 57 DCR 7171
1981 Ed., § 6-2025.
1973 Ed., § 6-1626.
D.C. Law 18-273 inserted “In addition to the disclosures authorized pursuant to Chapter 2A of this title, a mental health professional”; and inserted “any manner; except, that de-identified data may be shared in accordance with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, approved August 21, 1996 (110 Stat. 1936; 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.)”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 204(b) of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-530, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8099).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 204(b) of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).